New York, session 2025-2026, S7809.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 27 of the environmental conservation law is amended 2 by adding a new title 34 to read as follows: 3 TITLE 34 4 STATE COMPOSTING PROGRAMS 5 Section 27-3401. State composting programs. 6 § 27-3401. State composting programs. 7 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have 8 the following meanings: 9 (a) "agency" means any department, agency, board, public benefit 10 corporation, public authority, or commission; and 11 (b) "compostable" means all the materials in the product will (i) 12 undergo degradation by biological processes during composting to yield 13 carbon dioxide, water, inorganic compounds, and biomass at a rate 14 consistent with other known compostable materials; and (ii) leave no 15 visible, distinguishable or toxic residue, including no adverse impact 16 on the ability of composts to support plant growth once the finished 17 compost is placed in soil. 18 2. Beginning one year after the effective date of this section, all 19 state agencies shall establish a composting program in buildings owned, 20 occupied or operated by such agencies that shall, at a minimum: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04338-04-6 S. 7809--A 2 1 (a) require that all compostable waste including but not limited to 2 food scraps, plant trimmings, food-soiled paper and certified composta- 3 ble products from garbage and other recyclables be separated and placed 4 in labeled containers; 5 (b) post and maintain signs with instructions on identifying and sepa- 6 rating compostable waste from garbage and recyclables; 7 (c) ensure agency employees place compostable waste in appropriately 8 labeled containers and do not mix such waste with garbage or recycla- 9 bles; 10 (d) ensure containers are latched at the time of storage or set-out; 11 and 12 (e) arrange for compostable waste to be transported and/or processed 13 separately from garbage and recycling. 14 3. Each state agency may arrange for collection of compostable waste 15 by a private carter, transport such waste itself or process such waste 16 on-site. 17 4. Beginning one year after the establishment of the program pursuant 18 to subdivision two of this section, and annually thereafter, each state 19 agency shall report to the department on such program, including, but 20 not limited to (i) an estimate of the amount of compostable waste 21 collected; and (ii) the costs associated with such program. 22 5. (a) An agency need not comply with subdivisions two and three of 23 this section with respect to a particular building if it provides the 24 department with a written explanation that compliance for such building 25 would be infeasible or would impose unreasonable costs because: (i) the 26 building generates only a de minimis quantity of compostable waste; (ii) 27 the building is located in a municipality or region with limited compost 28 management infrastructure, or insufficient service availability neces- 29 sary to support compliance; or (iii) geographic, climatic, or environ- 30 mental conditions such as high elevation, extreme temperatures, or other 31 factors that interfere with biological decomposition processes, make the 32 establishment or maintenance of composting operations impracticable. 33 (b) An agency must reevaluate each building for which it is not in 34 compliance every five years and submit a new non-compliance explanation, 35 as applicable, at such time. 36 (c) The provisions of subdivisions two and three of this section shall 37 not apply to buildings located within a municipality which establishes 38 and implements a composting program by adopting a local law or ordi- 39 nance. 40 Buildings required to comply with a municipal composting program 41 enacted by a municipal law or ordinance are exempt from the requirements 42 of subdivisions two and three of this section. 43 6. By December first, two thousand thirty, and annually thereafter, 44 the department shall post a report on its website detailing state agency 45 composting programs in the state. Such report shall include an evalu- 46 ation of the effectiveness of such composting programs, information on 47 costs and collection rates, and compliance exemptions pursuant to subdi- 48 vision five of this section. 49 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.